test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v4_oitte_piikaroita_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - piikaroita - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     piikaroita+V+Inf: piikaroita
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piikaroitten
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piikaroittet
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piikaroittee
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: piikaroittema
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: piikaroittetta
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: piikaroithaan
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: piikaroittin
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: piikaroittit
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: piikaroitti
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: piikaroittima
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: piikaroittitta
     piikaroita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: piikaroithiin
     piikaroita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: piikaroinu
     piikaroita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: piikaroittu
     piikaroita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: piikaroinheet
     piikaroita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: piikaroiva
     piikaroita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: piikaroivat
     piikaroita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: piikaroittava
     piikaroita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: piikaroittavat

     piikaroita+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: piikaroittisin
     piikaroita+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: piikaroittisit
     piikaroita+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: piikaroittis
     piikaroita+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: piikaroittisimma
     piikaroita+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: piikaroittisitta
     piikaroita+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: piikaroittais
     piikaroita+V+Pass+Cond: piikaroittais

     piikaroita+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: piikaroitte
     piikaroita+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: piikaroikkaa
     
     piikaroita+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: piikaroittemassa
     piikaroita+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: piikaroittemasta
     piikaroita+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: piikaroittemhaan
     piikaroita+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: piikaroittemalla
     piikaroita+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: piikaroittematta
